test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kjalj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - кяль: # Ordinary nouns 'tongue' - full paradigm including MWN
     кяль+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: кяль
     кяль+N+SP+Gen+Indef: кялень
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+Indef: кяльда
     кяль+N+SP+Dat+Indef: кяленди
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+Indef: кяльфтома
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+Indef: кяльшка
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+Indef: кяльса
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+Indef: кяльста
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+Indef: кяльс
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+Indef: кяльгя
     кяль+N+SP+Tra+Indef: кялькс
     кяль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: кялезе
     кяль+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: кялене
     кяль+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: кялезень
     кяль+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: кяльнень
     кяль+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [кялезти, кялезенди]
     кяль+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: кяльненди
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: кяльдон
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: кяльфтомон
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: кяльшкан
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: кяльсон
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: кяльстон
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: кялезон
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: кяльгян
     кяль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: кяльце
     кяль+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: кяльхне
     кяль+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: кяльцень
     кяль+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: кяльхнень
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: кяльдот
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: кяльфтомот
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: кяльшкат
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: кяльсот
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: кяльстот
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: кялезот
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: кяльгят
     кяль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: кяльц
     кяль+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: кяленза
     кяль+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: кяленц
     кяль+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: кялензон
     кяль+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: кяленцты
     кяль+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: кялензонды
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: кяльдонза
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: кяльфтомонза
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: кяльшканза
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: кяльсонза
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: кяльстонза
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: кяльзонза
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: кяльгянза
     кяль+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: кяленьке
     кяль+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: кяленьконь
     кяль+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: кяленьконди
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: кяльдонк
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: кяльфтомонк
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: кяльшканк
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: кяльсонк
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: кяльстонк
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: кяльзонк
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: кяльгянк
     кяль+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: кяленте
     кяль+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: кялентень
     кяль+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: кялентенди
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: кяльдонт
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: кяльфтомонт
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: кяльшкант
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: кяльсонт
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: кяльстонт
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: кялезонт
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: кяльгянт
     кяль+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: кяльсна
     кяль+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: кяльснон
     кяль+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: кяльснонды
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: кяльдост
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: кяльфтомост
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: кяльшкаст
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: кяльсост
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: кяльстост
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: кялезост
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: кяльгяст
     кяль+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: кяльхт
     кяль+N+Sg+Nom+Def: кяльсь
     кяль+N+Sg+Gen+Def: кяльть
     кяль+N+Sg+Dat+Def: [кяльти, кяленди]
     кяль+N+Pl+Nom+Def: кяльхне
     кяль+N+Pl+Gen+Def: кяльхнень
     кяль+N+Pl+Dat+Def: кяльхненди
     кяль+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: кялевок
     кяль+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: кяленьвок
     #кяль+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/гЕ: кяленьге 
     #сон+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Foc/гЕ: сонга 
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: кяльдовок
     кяль+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: кяленьдивок
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: кяльфтомовок
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+Indef+Foc/вок: кяльшкавок
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: кяльсовок
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: кяльстовок
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: кяльска
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: кяльгявок
     кяль+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: кялькска
     кяль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кялезевок
     кяль+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кяленевок
     кяль+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кялезеньге
     кяль+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кялененьге
     кяль+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: [кялезтивок, кялезендивок]
     кяль+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кяленендивок
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кяльдонга
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кяльфтомонга
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кяльшканка
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кяльсонга
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кяльстонга
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кялезонга
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кяльгянга
     кяль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кяльцевок
     кяль+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кяльхневок
     кяль+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кяльценьге
     кяль+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кяльхненьге
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кяльдотка
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кяльфтомотка
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кяльшкатка
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кяльсотка
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кяльстотка
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кялезотка
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кяльгятка
     кяль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кяльцевок
     кяль+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кялензовок
     кяль+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кяленцка
     кяль+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кялензонга
     кяль+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кяленцтывок
     кяль+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кялензондывок
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кяльдонзовок
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кяльфтомонзовок
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кяльшканзовок
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кяльсонзовок
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кяльстонзовок
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кяльзонзовок
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кяльгянзовок
     кяль+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кяленькевок
     кяль+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кяленьконьге
     кяль+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кяленькондивок
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кяльдонковок
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кяльфтомонковок
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кяльшканковок
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кяльсонковок
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кяльстонковок
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кяльзонковок
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кяльгянковок
     кяль+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кялентевок
     кяль+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кялентеньге
     кяль+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кялентендивок
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кяльдонтка
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кяльфтомонтовок
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кяльшкантовок
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кяльсонтка
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кяльстонтка
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кялезонтка
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кяльгянтка
     кяль+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кяльсновок
     кяль+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кяльснонга
     кяль+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кяльснондывок
     кяль+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кяльдостка
     кяль+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кяльфтомостка
     кяль+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кяльшкастка
     кяль+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кяльсостка
     кяль+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кяльстостка
     кяль+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кялезостка
     кяль+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кяльгястка
     кяль+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: кяльхтка
     кяль+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: кяльське
     кяль+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: кяльтьке
     кяль+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: [кяльтивок, кяленьдивок]
     кяль+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: кяльхневок
     кяль+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: кяльхненьге
     кяль+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: кяльхнендивок
